src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!!   =================================== !
!! # The Basque  morphophonological file 
!!   =================================== !

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-eus/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! ## Alphabets, Sets
Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n ñ o p q r s t u v w x y z
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N Ñ O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 

 %> ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u;

 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;
 
 Nas = m n ;
 NonNas = b c d f g h j k l p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;

!! ## Rules
Rules


"ae -> e"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 a:0 <=> _ %> e ;
 
!€ a:0 > e
 
"r doubling"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 0:r <=> Vow r %> _ Vow ;
 
"tz > t"
!! Rule: **@RULENAME@**
 z:0 <=> s i: %> t _ e n ; 
  
!€ s i > t z:0 e n

 
